Vermont, session 2025-2026, H85.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 32 V.S.A. § 8911(23) is amended to read:
(23) The following motor vehicles, including their repair parts, used for
in forestry operations, including timber cutting,; timber removal, and
processing of; and transportation of equipment, timber, or other solid wood
forest products intended to be sold ultimately at retail: skidders with grapple
and cable, feller bunchers, cut-to-length processors, forwarders, delimbers,
loader slashers, log loaders, whole-tree chippers, stationary screening systems,
and firewood processors, elevators, and screens, motor trucks, motor vehicles,
semi-trailers, tractors, truck cranes, truck tractors, and trailers. The
Department of Motor Vehicles shall publish guidance relating to the
application of this exemption.
Sec. 2. 32 V.S.A. § 9741(51) is amended to read:
(51) The following machinery, including repair parts, used for in
forestry operations, including timber cutting,; timber removal, and processing
of; and transportation of equipment, timber, or other solid wood forest products
intended to be sold ultimately at retail: skidders with grapple and cable; feller
VT LEG #379472 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.85
2025 Page 3 of 3
bunchers; cut-to-length processors; forwarders; delimbers; loader slashers; log
loaders; whole-tree chippers; stationary screening systems; firewood
processors, elevators, and screens, motor trucks, motor vehicles, semi-trailers,
tractors, truck cranes, truck tractors, and trailers; and when sold for use on any
machinery listed under this subdivision, traction enhancement accessories, tire
chains, track systems, and winch cables. The Department of Taxes shall
publish guidance relating to the application of this exemption.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #379472 v.1